Washington statutes.
RCW 7.84.040

Jurisdiction of court—Venue.

(1) Infraction proceedings may be heard and determined by a district court.

(2) Infraction proceedings shall be brought in the district court district in which the infraction occurred. If an infraction takes place in the offshore waters, as defined in RCW 77.08.010, the infraction proceeding may be brought in any county bordering on the Pacific Ocean.

[ 2003 c 39 s 4; 1987 c 380 s 4.]